Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 72.09.080 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The correctional industries advisory committee shall consist of 11 voting members in total, with nine of the voting members((,)) appointed by the secretary and two of the voting members appointed by the governor. Each member shall serve a three-year staggered term. The speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate shall each appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses in their respective houses. The legislators so appointed shall be nonvoting members and shall serve two-year terms, or until they cease to be members of the house from which they were appointed, whichever occurs first. The nine members appointed by the secretary shall include three representatives from labor, three representatives from business representing cross sections of industries and all sizes of employers, and three members from the general public. The two voting members appointed by the governor must be individuals from underrepresented populations who have direct lived experience as those terms are defined in RCW 43.18A.010, but may not be currently incarcerated in total confinement as that term is defined in RCW 9.94A.030.(2) The committee shall elect a chair and such other officers as it deems appropriate from among the voting members.(3) The voting members of the committee shall serve with compensation pursuant to RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed by the department for travel expenses and per diem under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, as now or hereafter amended. Legislative members shall be reimbursed under RCW 44.04.120, as now or hereafter amended.(4) The secretary shall provide such staff services, facilities, and equipment as the board shall require to carry out its duties.--- END ---